Iowa, session 2025-2026, 5469DP.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 5469DP (1) 91
lh/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 21.4, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
a. Except as provided in subsection 3, a governmental body
shall give notice of the time, date, and place of each meeting,
including a reconvened meeting of the governmental body, and
the tentative agenda of the meeting, in a manner reasonably
calculated to apprise the public of that information.
Reasonable
(1) Giving notice under this paragraph shall include
advising all of the following:
(a) Advising the news media who have filed a request for
notice with the governmental body and posting.
(b) Posting the notice on a bulletin board or other in a
prominent and conspicuous place which is easily accessible
to the public and clearly designated for that purpose at the
principal office of the body holding the meeting, or if no such
office exists, at the building in which the meeting is to be
held annually designated for such purposes by the governmental
body, in a manner such that the notice is visible at all times.
(c) Posting the notice on any internet site owned or
maintained and regularly updated by the governmental body or
other internet presence moderated by the governmental body, if
applicable.
(2) If a tentative agenda has been posted and is amended
within the time frame established in subsection 2, paragraph
“a”, the governmental body shall mark the agenda “AMENDED”
and identify the amended provisions. Upon amendment, the
governmental body shall give notice in accordance with
subparagraph (1).